Connecticut, session 2026, HB05567.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 18-81qq of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective from passage):
(a) (1) There is, within the Office of Governmental Accountability
established under section 1-300, the Office of the Correction Ombuds for
the provision of ombuds services. The Correction Ombuds appointed
pursuant to section 18-81jj shall be the head of said office.
(2) For purposes of this section, "ombuds services" includes:
(A) Evaluating the delivery of services to persons who are
incarcerated by the Department of Correction;
(B) Reviewing periodically the nonemergency procedures
established by the department to carry out the provisions of title 18 and
evaluating whether such procedures conflict with the rights of persons
who are incarcerated;
(C) Receiving communications, including telephone calls and

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
electronic mail from persons who are incarcerated, who shall be
permitted to make such telephone or electronic mail communications
free of charge, regarding decisions, actions, omissions, policies,
procedures, rules or regulations of the department;
(D) Conducting announced or unannounced site visits of correctional
facilities administered by the department, without restrictions on such
visits, including during periods when a facility is locked down or
experiencing a facility-wide emergency, provided the department may
restrict access to a portion of a facility in an emergency situation for the
duration of the emergency. For the purpose of this subparagraph, a
situation or event constituting an emergency shall be determined by the
commissioner or the commissioner's designee, to be a situation
constituting a significant risk to the safety or security of the facility, or
the health, safety or security of department staff or persons who are
incarcerated, or an event that significantly compromises the operations
of the facility;
(E) Reviewing the operation of correctional facilities and
nonemergency procedures employed at such facilities. Nonemergency
procedures include, but are not limited to, the department's use of force
procedures;
(F) Recommending procedure and policy revisions to the
department;
(G) Taking all possible actions, including, but not limited to,
conducting programs of public education, undertaking legislative
advocacy and making proposals for systemic reform and formal legal
action in order to secure and ensure the rights of persons in the custody
of the commissioner. The Correction Ombuds is not authorized to
institute litigation;
(H) Conducting surveys by sending or distributing during facility
Public Act No. 26-40 2 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
visits, confidential written and electronic communications or
questionnaires to persons who are incarcerated or employees of the
Department of Correction concerning conditions of confinement,
working conditions or other subjects within the scope of the duties of
the Office of the Correction Ombuds, without prior approval of the
department. Such persons who are incarcerated or employees shall be
permitted to complete and return to said office such surveys either in
written format or electronically. No survey may be sent or distributed
to an employee of the Department of Correction, unless the Correction
Ombuds previously made such survey available for review and
comment by the bargaining units representing such employees;
(I) Publishing on an Internet web site operated by the Office of the
Correction Ombuds a semiannual summary of all ombuds services and
activities during the six-month period before such publication; and
(J) Evaluating the provision of health care services, including, but not
limited to, medical care, dental care, mental health care and substance
use disorder treatment services, to persons who are incarcerated by the
Department of Correction.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
Correction Ombuds shall act independently of any department in the
performance of the office's duties.
(c) The Correction Ombuds may, within available funds, appoint
such staff as may be deemed necessary. The duties of the staff may
include the duties and powers of the Correction Ombuds if performed
under the direction of the Correction Ombuds.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
appropriations recommended for the Office of the Correction Ombuds
shall be the estimates of the expenditure requirements transmitted to the
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management by the Correction
Public Act No. 26-40 3 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
Ombuds and the recommended adjustments and revisions of such
estimates shall be the recommended adjustments and revisions, if any,
transmitted by said Correction Ombuds to the director of the Office of
Policy and Management.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
Governor shall not reduce allotment requisitions or allotments in force
concerning the Office of the Correction Ombuds.
(e) (1) The Correction Ombuds need not investigate a complaint, if
the Correction Ombuds determines such investigation is not warranted.
If the Correction Ombuds determines that such investigation is not
warranted, the Correction Ombuds shall inform the person making the
complaint of such decision in writing, which complaint and decision
shall be confidential and exempt from the Freedom of Information Act,
as defined in section 1-200, and shall not be disclosed without the
consent of such person.
(2) In the course of an investigation, the Correction Ombuds shall rely
on a variety of sources to corroborate matters raised by persons who are
incarcerated or others. Where such matters turn on validation of
particular incidents, the Correction Ombuds shall endeavor to rely on
communications from persons who are incarcerated. [who have
reasonably pursued a resolution of the complaint through any existing
internal grievance procedures of the Department of Correction.] In all
events, the Correction Ombuds shall make good faith efforts to provide
an opportunity to the Commissioner of Correction to investigate and to
respond to such concerns prior to making such matters public.
(3) (A) At the conclusion of an investigation, the Correction Ombuds
shall render a public decision on the merits of each complaint.
Documents supporting the decision are subject to relevant
confidentiality provisions, but may be disclosed by request of and to (i)
the complainant or an authorized representative of the family of the
Public Act No. 26-40 4 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
complainant as disclosed to the Correction Ombuds, or (ii) the
chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the
Department of Correction. The Correction Ombuds shall communicate
the decision to the person making the complaint and to the department.
The Correction Ombuds shall include in any decision findings of any
department administrative directive, state or constitutional right that
has been violated by the department or an employee of the department
and recommendations and reasoning if, in the Correction Ombuds'
opinion, the department or any employee should (I) further investigate
the complaint; (II) modify or cancel an action of the department or
employee; (III) alter a department rule, practice or ruling; (IV) explain
in detail the action in question; or (V) rectify an omission of the
department or employee.
(B) At least [ninety-six hours] three business days prior to issuing a
decision pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this subdivision that
expressly, or by implication, criticizes the department or an employee
of the department, the Correction Ombuds shall consult with the
department or employee or a representative of the employee's
bargaining unit, as applicable.
(4) At the Correction Ombuds' request, the department shall, during
a period of time agreed upon with the Correction Ombuds, inform the
Correction Ombuds of any action taken on recommendations contained
in a decision pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection or any reason
for not complying with any such recommendation. The Correction
Ombuds shall notify the incarcerated person whose complaint resulted
in a decision containing such recommendation, of any action taken by
the department in response to such recommendation.
(f) All oral and written communications, including, but not limited
to, in response to any survey, and records relating to such
communications between a person in the custody of the Commissioner
Public Act No. 26-40 5 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
of Correction, or an employee of the Department of Correction, and the
Correction Ombuds or a member of the Office of the Correction
Ombuds staff, including, but not limited to, the identity of a
complainant, the details of the communications and the Correction
Ombuds' findings shall be confidential and exempt from the Freedom
of Information Act, as defined in section 1-200, and shall not be disclosed
without the consent of such person, except that the Correction Ombuds
(1) may disclose without the consent of such person general findings or
policy recommendations based on such communications, provided no
individually identifiable information is disclosed, and (2) shall
immediately disclose to the Commissioner of Correction any
communication concerning a physical threat made against such person's
self, a member of the public, an incarcerated person or an employee of
the Department of Correction. For the purposes of this section, identical
or blank surveys and questionnaires received by said office shall not be
confidential.
(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (f) of this section,
whenever in the course of carrying out the Correction Ombuds' duties,
the Correction Ombuds or a member of the Office of the Correction
Ombuds staff becomes aware of the commission or planned commission
of a criminal act or threat that the Correction Ombuds reasonably
believes is likely to result in death or substantial bodily harm, the
Correction Ombuds shall immediately notify the Commissioner of
Correction or an administrator of any correctional facility housing the
perpetrator or potential perpetrator of such act or threat and the nature
and target of the act or threat.
(h) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes concerning
the confidentiality of records and information, the Correction Ombuds
shall have access to, including the right to inspect and copy, any records
necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the Correction Ombuds, as
provided in this section. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
Public Act No. 26-40 6 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
construed to compel access to any record protected by the attorney-
client privilege or attorney-work product doctrine or any record related
to a pending internal investigation, external criminal investigation or
emergency procedures. For purposes of this subsection, "emergency
procedures" are procedures the Department of Correction uses to
manage control of tools, keys and armories and concerning department
emergency plans, emergency response units, facility security levels and
standards and radio communications.
(i) The Correction Ombuds, if a commissioner of the Superior Court,
may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance and testimony of
witnesses or the production of books, papers and other documents and
administer oaths to witnesses in any matter under investigation. Any
such subpoena shall be served upon the person to whom such subpoena
is issued not later than fifteen days prior to the time specified in the
subpoena for compliance. Such person may, not later than fifteen days
after service of such subpoena, or on or before the time specified in the
subpoena for compliance, whichever is later, serve upon the Correction
Ombuds written objection to the subpoena and file such objection in the
superior court for the judicial district of Hartford, which shall adjudicate
such objection in accordance with the rules of the court. If any person to
whom such subpoena is issued fails to so object or appear or, having
appeared, refuses to give testimony or fails to produce the evidence
required, the Correction Ombuds may apply to the superior court for
the judicial district of Hartford, which shall have jurisdiction to order
such person to appear and give testimony or to produce such evidence,
as the case may be. If a written objection to a subpoena issued pursuant
to this subsection is overruled in its entirety by the superior court for the
judicial district of Hartford, the court shall order the Department of
Correction to reimburse the Office of the Correction Ombuds for the
reasonable costs of service of such subpoena, unless the court finds that
the objection was substantially justified.
Public Act No. 26-40 7 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
(j) In the performance of the duties provided for in this section, the
Correction Ombuds may communicate privately with any person in the
custody of the commissioner. Such communications shall be
confidential except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section.
(k) (1) The Correction Ombuds may conduct hearings in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 54 and may request that any person
appear before the Correction Ombuds or at a hearing and give
testimony or produce documentary or other evidence that the
Correction Ombuds considers relevant to a matter under investigation.
(2) The Correction Ombuds, when scheduling such hearing, shall
arrange an appearance of a person who is incarcerated or an employee
of the department in cooperation with the department at a time and
location that does not interfere with the operation of a correctional
facility. Any appearance of a person who is incarcerated shall occur at
the facility where such person is incarcerated at the time of the hearing.
(l) The Correction Ombuds shall make available to persons who are
incarcerated confidential means by which to report concerns or
otherwise submit complaints to the Correction Ombuds, which may
include, but need not be limited to (1) electronic means or a locked box,
accessible only by the Correction Ombuds and the employees of the
Office of the Correction Ombuds, and (2) a hotline for persons who are
incarcerated to communicate with said office. All measures shall be
taken to ensure there is no risk or credible fear of retaliation against
persons who are incarcerated for submitting complaints to the
Correction Ombuds. Submission of complaints to the Correction
Ombuds shall not be part of the department administrative grievance or
appeal process, and the Correction Ombuds' decisions shall not
constitute agency action. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to
constitute part of the administrative exhaustion process. The Correction
Ombuds shall not require persons who are incarcerated to file
grievances or other inquiries as part of the department's system to be
Public Act No. 26-40 8 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
considered ripe for review by the Correction Ombuds.
(m) In the performance of the responsibilities provided for in this
section, the Correction Ombuds may communicate privately with any
person in the custody of the commissioner. Such communications shall
be confidential except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this
section.
(n) The Correction Ombuds may apply for and accept grants, gifts
and bequests of funds from other states, federal and interstate agencies,
for the purpose of carrying out the Correction Ombuds' responsibilities.
There is established a Correction Ombuds account, which shall be a
separate, nonlapsing account. Any funds received under this subsection
shall, upon deposit in the General Fund, be credited to said account and
may be used by the Correction Ombuds in the performance of the
Correction Ombuds' duties.
(o) The name, address and other personally identifiable information
of a person who makes a complaint to the Correction Ombuds,
information obtained or generated by the Office of the Correction
Ombuds in the course of an investigation and all confidential records
obtained by the Correction Ombuds or the office shall be confidential
and shall not be subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information
Act, as defined in section 1-200, or otherwise except as provided in
subsections (f) and (g) of this section.
(p) No state or municipal agency shall discharge, or in any manner
discriminate or retaliate against, any employee who in good faith makes
a complaint to the Correction Ombuds or cooperates with the Office of
the Correction Ombuds in an investigation.
(q) The Correction Ombuds may perform the following functions in
the evaluation of the provision of health care services pursuant to
subparagraph (J) of subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section:
Public Act No. 26-40 9 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
(1) Receive, investigate and respond to complaints regarding access
to or quality of health care services within the Department of Correction;
(2) Employ or contract with licensed health care professionals to
provide independent clinical reviews of such complaints, when
necessary;
(3) Collect and analyze health-related data across correctional
facilities, including, but not limited to:
(A) Medical appointment wait times;
(B) Mental health care access;
(C) Medication access and continuity; and
(D) Incidences of hospitalizations and mortalities; and
(4) Make recommendations to the Departments of Correction and
Public Health and the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public health and the
judiciary regarding necessary improvements in the delivery of health
care services within correctional facilities.
(r) Not later than December first, annually, the Correction Ombuds
shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a,
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to the Department of Correction
regarding the conditions of confinement in the state's correctional
facilities and halfway houses, including, but not limited to, the delivery
of health care services in such facilities and halfway houses. Such report
shall detail the Correction Ombuds' findings and recommendations,
including, but not limited to, recommendations for any improvements
in the delivery of such services.
(s) (1) Not later than January 1, 2027, there shall be a Correction
Public Act No. 26-40 10 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
Mental Health Care Clinician employed within the Office of the
Correction Ombuds who (A) (i) holds a doctoral degree in clinical
psychology, (ii) holds an applicable professional license issued by this
state under chapter 383, or (iii) is an advanced practice registered nurse
licensed under chapter 378 and specializes in mental health care, and (B)
has experience in clinical mental health care, forensic psychology,
correctional health or a related field.
(2) Said clinician shall assist persons who are incarcerated with
matters relating to mental health care, including access to services,
psychiatric medication management, continuity of care, treatment
planning and patient rights.
(t) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes or any
administrative directive of the Department of Correction, the Correction
Ombuds may possess and use state-issued cellular telephones and other
state-issued electronic communication devices while conducting official
duties within any correctional facility under the jurisdiction of the
Department of Correction. Such possession and use of such cellular
telephones shall not be restricted and such cellular telephones and other
state-issued electronic communication devices shall not be deemed
contraband.
Sec. 2. Section 18-81ll of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The Department of Correction shall post in conspicuous places
throughout each correctional facility, including in any medical unit of
such facility, notice concerning the rights to access medical care by a
person who is incarcerated. Such notice shall be written in plain
language in English and Spanish and shall, at a minimum: (1) Describe
the person's right to receive prescribed medications; (2) explain how to
request medical and mental health care; (3) explain how to report
missed or delayed administration of medications; and (4) provide
Public Act No. 26-40 11 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
contact information for the Correction Mental Health Care Clinician.
The department shall also make such notice available electronically on
any portable electronic device that may be accessible by any such
person.
(b) (1) The department shall, during the intake of any person who is
incarcerated, (A) verify directly with such person any medications taken
by such person, or make such verification through the State-wide Health
Information Exchange, established pursuant to section 17b-59d, the
pharmacy used by such person or such person's prescribing health care
provider, (B) request that such person provide the name of such person's
primary care provider and authorize the sharing of medical information
with such provider and a designated family member or health care
proxy by signing a release of information form, and (C) accept from such
person any prescription medication such person has in such person's
possession for storage and administration by appropriate Department
of Correction staff as prescribed to such person.
(2) Not later than five days after intake of any person who is
incarcerated, the department shall provide such person with the
opportunity to authorize the sharing of medical information with the
Office of the Correction Ombuds.
(c) The department shall post on its Internet web site and in [all of its]
each of the department's medical units notice informing [the inmate that
he or she is] persons who are incarcerated that such persons are required
to sign a release of information form if [the inmate wishes the inmate's
family or emergency contact] such person wishes such person's primary
care provider, designated family member, health care proxy or the
Office of the Correction Ombuds to have access to [the inmate's] such
person's medical information. [The department shall post the release of
information form on its Internet web site and shall be make such form
available upon request in all of the department's medical units.]
Public Act No. 26-40 12 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
(d) The department shall develop a "frequently asked questions"
document that details the steps involved in investigating [an inmate] a
fatality or permanent injury suffered by a person who is incarcerated
and includes all relevant forms and contact information. The
department shall post the "frequently asked questions" document on its
Internet web site and shall make such document available upon request
in all of the department's medical units.
(e) (1) Beginning not later than July 1, 2026, the department shall not
assess any fee, fine, cost or surcharge against any person in the custody
of the department for health care services of any kind, including, but not
limited to, medical, dental, mental health or optometric services,
specialty or emergency care, scheduled follow-up treatment, medical,
dental or optometric devices, including eyeglasses, and laboratory
testing.
(2) The department shall cancel any outstanding liability for such
fees, fines, costs or surcharges assessed against any person in the
custody of the department prior to the department ceasing to asses such
fees, fines, costs or surcharges pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
(f) The department shall, within available bond authorizations,
develop, implement and maintain an electronic health records system,
or enter into a contract for the provision of such system. Such system
shall be and shall include:
(1) A method by which a person who is incarcerated may (A) digitally
request medical care by use of a secure messaging system from within
facilities operated by the department, including through the use of a
portable electronic device that may be accessible by such person, a
stationary electronic device or a telephonic request system, provided
any such method for requesting medical care shall be in addition to any
existing written and oral methods to request medical care, and (B) access
Public Act No. 26-40 13 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
records concerning current medication, medication schedules,
administration of medication and missed or delayed doses;
(2) A logging system whereby any request described in subdivision
(1) of this subsection is (A) digitally logged and time-stamped, (B)
integrated into the other records maintained as part of the electronic
health records system associated with the person who is incarcerated
who is making the request, and (C) reviewable by medical staff, the
person who is incarcerated and the Office of the Correction Ombuds,
provided the person who is incarcerated has granted access to said office
to review such records; and
(3) An access point to such system available to each person who is
incarcerated in any medical unit of the department.
(g) The Department of Correction shall ensure that medically
necessary procedures for persons who are incarcerated are provided in
a timely and clinically appropriate manner. The department may
provide routine or emergent procedures within a correctional facility
when such procedures can be safely performed in such setting. Any
procedure requiring specialized equipment, a higher level of care, or
that cannot be safely performed within a correctional facility shall be
provided by a health care institution licensed in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 368v. The department shall document and track
any delay, denial or refusal of medically necessary care, including the
reason for such delay, denial or refusal, and shall use such information
to identify and address barriers to care. A clinical determination that a
procedure is a medically necessary procedure may not be overridden
for nonclinical reasons, except that the Commissioner of Correction, or
the commissioner's designee, may delay or override such procedure
upon a determination that a specific and articulable safety or security
risk exists that cannot be reasonably mitigated. In the event that the
department is unable to provide for a timely medically necessary
procedure or such procedure is overridden pursuant to this subsection,
Public Act No. 26-40 14 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
the commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, shall document the
reason why such procedure was not provided or was delayed. Such
documentation shall be included in the electronic health records system
maintained pursuant to subsection (f) of this section. For purposes of
this subsection, "medically necessary procedure" means those
procedures performed by a medical professional in a location,
including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic or outpatient center,
which are required to prevent, identify, diagnose, treat, rehabilitate or
ameliorate an individual's medical condition, including mental illness,
or its effects, in order to attain or maintain the individual's achievable
health and independent functioning provided such procedures are: (1)
Consistent with generally accepted standards of medical practice that
are defined as standards that are based on (A) credible scientific
evidence published in peer-reviewed medical literature that is generally
recognized by the relevant medical community, (B) recommendations
of a physician-specialty society, (C) the views of physicians practicing
in relevant clinical areas, and (D) any other relevant factors; (2) clinically
appropriate in terms of type, frequency, timing, site, extent and duration
and considered effective for the individual's illness, injury or disease; (3)
not primarily for the convenience of the individual, the individual's
health care provider or other health care providers; (4) not more costly
than an alternative service or sequence of services at least as likely to
produce equivalent therapeutic or diagnostic results as to the diagnosis
or treatment of the individual's illness, injury or disease; and (5) based
on an assessment of the individual and the individual's medical
condition.
Sec. 3. Section 18-81pp of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means an advanced practice
Public Act No. 26-40 15 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
registered nurse licensed under chapter [373] 378;
(2) "Alcohol and drug counselor" means an alcohol and drug
counselor licensed or certified under chapter 376b;
(3) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Correction;
(4) "Correctional institution" means a prison or jail under the
jurisdiction of the commissioner;
(5) "Dental professional" means a (A) dentist, (B) dental hygienist
licensed under chapter 379a, or (C) dental assistant, as defined in section
20-112a;
(6) "Dentist" means a dentist licensed under chapter 379;
(7) "Department" means the Department of Correction;
(8) "Discharge planner" means a (A) registered nurse licensed under
chapter 378, (B) practical nurse licensed under chapter 378, (C) clinical
social worker or master social worker licensed under chapter 383b, or
(D) professional counselor licensed under chapter 383c;
(9) "HIV test" means a test to determine human immunodeficiency
virus infection or antibodies to human immunodeficiency virus;
(10) "Medical professional" means (A) a physician, (B) an advanced
practice registered nurse, (C) a physician assistant, (D) a registered
nurse licensed under chapter 378, or (E) a practical nurse licensed under
chapter 378;
(11) "Mental health care provider" means (A) a physician who
specializes in psychiatry, or (B) an advanced practice registered nurse
who specializes in mental health;
(12) "Mental health therapist" means (A) a physician who specializes
Public Act No. 26-40 16 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
in psychiatry, (B) a psychologist licensed under chapter 383, (C) an
advanced practice registered nurse who specializes in mental health, (D)
a clinical social worker or master social worker licensed under chapter
383b, or (E) a professional counselor licensed under chapter 383c;
(13) "Physician" means a physician licensed under chapter 370;
(14) "Physician assistant" means a physician assistant licensed under
chapter 370; and
(15) "Psychotropic medication" means a medication that is used to
treat a mental health disorder that affects behavior, mood, thoughts or
perception.
(b) Not later than October 1, 2025, the commissioner shall develop a
plan for the provision of health care services, including, but not limited
to, mental health care, substance use disorder and dental care services,
to persons who are incarcerated under the jurisdiction of the
department. Such plan shall ensure, at a minimum, that:
(1) (A) There is a sufficient number of mental health therapists, as
determined by the commissioner, at each correctional institution to
provide mental health care services to persons who are incarcerated;
(B) There is a mental health therapist placed at a correctional
institution to provide mental health care services to any person who is
incarcerated who requests such services or has been referred for such
services by correctional staff only after the therapist makes an
assessment of the person's need for such services and determines that
the person requires such services;
(C) Each mental health therapist shall deliver such services in concert
with the security needs of all persons who are incarcerated and
correctional staff and the overall operation of the correctional
institution, as determined by the warden of the correctional institution;
Public Act No. 26-40 17 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
and
(D) No mental health therapist who is providing mental health care
services pursuant to this subdivision and licensed to prescribe
medication shall prescribe a psychotropic medication to a person who
is incarcerated unless (i) the mental health therapist has reviewed the
mental health history and medical history of the person, including, but
not limited to, the list of all medications the person is taking, (ii) the
mental health therapist determines, based on a review of such history,
that the benefits of prescribing such medication outweigh the risk of
prescribing such medication, (iii) the mental health therapist diagnoses
the person with a mental health disorder, the person has received a
previous diagnosis of a mental health disorder by a licensed mental
health care provider and such medication is used to treat such mental
health disorder, or, in an emergency situation, the mental health
therapist makes an assessment that the inmate's mental health is
substantially impaired and requires psychotropic medication to treat,
(iv) the mental health therapist approves the use of such medication by
the person as part of the person's mental health treatment plan, and (v)
the mental health therapist keeps a record of each psychotropic
medication such provider prescribes to the person and all other
medications the person is taking.
(2) Each person who is incarcerated shall receive an annual physical
examination by a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse when such examination is clinically indicated. Such
examination may include, but not be limited to, a breast and
gynecological examination or prostate examination, where appropriate,
and the administration of any test the physician, physician assistant or
advanced practice registered nurse deems appropriate.
(3) Each person who is incarcerated shall receive an initial health
assessment from a medical professional not later than fourteen days
after the person's initial intake into a correctional institution.
Public Act No. 26-40 18 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
(4) If a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered
nurse recommends, based on the initial health assessment of a person
who is incarcerated or other person, that such person who is
incarcerated or other person be placed in a medical or mental health
housing unit, the department shall ensure that such person who is
incarcerated or other person is placed in an appropriate medical or
mental health housing unit unless there are significant safety or security
reasons for not making such placement.
(5) A medical professional shall perform health assessments of
persons who are incarcerated in a location at the correctional institution
that the warden of the correctional institution designates as appropriate
for performing such an examination, provided the analysis of any
sample collected from the person who is incarcerated during a health
assessment may be performed at a laboratory that is located outside of
the correctional institution.
(6) A discharge planner shall conduct an exit interview of each person
who is incarcerated who is being scheduled for discharge from a
correctional institution prior to the date of discharge if such exit
interview is clinically indicated, provided the lack of such exit interview
shall not delay the scheduled discharge of a person who is incarcerated.
Such exit interview shall include a discussion with the person regarding
a medical discharge plan for any continued medical care or treatment
that is recommended by the physician, physician assistant or advanced
practice registered nurse for the person when the person reenters the
community.
(7) A physician shall be on call on weekends, holidays and outside
regular work hours to provide medical care to persons who are
incarcerated as necessary.
(8) The commissioner shall ensure that each person who is
incarcerated has access to all vaccines licensed or authorized under an
Public Act No. 26-40 19 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
emergency use authorization by the federal Food and Drug
Administration that are recommended by the National Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention Advisory Committee on Immunization
Practices, subject to availability of such vaccines, unless there are
substantial security concerns with providing access to such vaccines.
Subject to availability, a physician, physician assistant or advanced
practice registered nurse shall prescribe to a person who is incarcerated
any such vaccine that (A) the person requests, and (B) is recommended
for such person by said committee, as determined by the physician,
physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse, provided the
prescribing of such vaccine does not impose significant safety concerns.
(9) Except in exigent circumstances, a dental professional shall
perform a dental screening of each person who is incarcerated not later
than one year after the person initially enters a correctional institution
and at least once annually thereafter. At the time the dental professional
performs the dental screening of a person who is incarcerated, the dental
professional shall develop a dental care plan for the person. A dental
professional shall provide dental care in accordance with the person's
dental care plan throughout the person's time at the correctional
institution. The commissioner shall ensure, in consultation with a
dentist, that each correctional institution has a dental examination room
that is fully equipped with all of the dental equipment necessary to
perform a dental examination.
(10) A medical professional shall administer an HIV test to each
person who is incarcerated who requests an HIV test, subject to the
availability of such test. Except in exigent circumstances and subject to
availability, a medical professional shall offer an HIV test to each person
who is incarcerated where it is clinically indicated (A) at the time such
person enters a correctional institution, or (B) during an annual physical
assessment.
(11) A medical professional shall interview each person who is
Public Act No. 26-40 20 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
incarcerated regarding such person's drug and alcohol use and mental
health history at the time the person initially enters a correctional
institution. If the person is exhibiting symptoms of withdrawal from a
drug or alcohol or mental distress at such time, a medical professional
shall perform a physical and mental health assessment of the person and
communicate the results of such assessment to a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse, and a mental health care
provider or mental health therapist, if applicable. Except in exigent
circumstances, a drug and alcohol counselor shall perform an
evaluation of the person not later than five days after the person initially
enters the correctional institution. (A) The correctional institution shall
immediately transfer each such person who is determined by a
physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse to
be experiencing withdrawal from a drug or alcohol to an appropriate
area at such correctional institution for medical treatment of such
withdrawal. A physician, a physician assistant or an advanced practice
registered nurse shall periodically evaluate each person who is
incarcerated and exhibits signs of or discloses an addiction to a drug or
alcohol or who experiences withdrawal from a drug or alcohol, at a
frequency deemed appropriate by the physician, physician assistant or
advanced practice registered nurse. (B) In the case of a person who is
determined at the time of such person's intake into a correctional
institution to be in need of mental health services, such person shall be
provided evidence-based mental health interventions delivered by a
mental health care provider or mental health therapist, as needed,
within a reasonable amount of time after such determination of need,
but in no case later than two business days following such
determination. Such person shall be periodically evaluated by a mental
health care provider or mental health therapist and provided such
services, as needed.
(12) A physician, a physician assistant or an advanced practice
registered nurse with experience in substance use disorder diagnosis
Public Act No. 26-40 21 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
and treatment shall oversee the medical treatment of a person who is
incarcerated experiencing withdrawal from a drug or alcohol at each
correctional institution. A medical professional shall be present in the
medical unit at each correctional facility at all times during the provision
of medical treatment to such person.
(13) A drug and alcohol counselor shall offer appropriate substance
use disorder counseling services, including, but not limited to,
individual counseling sessions and group counseling sessions, to a
person who is incarcerated and exhibits signs of or discloses an
addiction to a drug or alcohol and encourage such person to participate
in at least one counselling session. At the time of discharge of a person
who is incarcerated from the correctional institution, a discharge
planner may refer any such person who has exhibited signs of or
disclosed an addiction to a drug or alcohol while incarcerated at such
correctional institution to a substance use disorder treatment program
in the community that is deemed appropriate for the person by such
discharge planner.
(14) The York Correctional Institution shall provide each pregnant
woman who is incarcerated and drug or alcohol-dependent, with
information regarding the dangers of undergoing withdrawal from the
drug or alcohol without medical treatment, the importance of receiving
medical treatment during the second trimester of pregnancy for
withdrawal from the drug or alcohol and the effects of neonatal
abstinence syndrome on a newborn.
(15) The York Correctional Institution shall provide each pregnant
woman who is incarcerated prenatal visits at a frequency determined by
an obstetrician to be consistent with community standards for prenatal
visits.
(16) The department shall issue a request for information to which a
school of medicine may apply for purposes of providing practical
Public Act No. 26-40 22 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
training at correctional institutions as part of a medical residency
program, through which residents participating in such program may
provide health care services to persons who are incarcerated.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall amend the
plan developed under subsection (b) of this section to ensure there is a
rule providing that there is no interruption in clinically necessary
medications upon intake of a person who is incarcerated to provide for
continuity of care for such person. The plan shall ensure that a service is
available for same-day delivery of a medication that such person needs.
[(c)] (d) Not later than [October 1, 2025] December 31, 2026, and
annually thereafter, the commissioner shall report, in accordance with
the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing committees of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public
health and the judiciary regarding any updates on the status of the
implementation of the plan developed pursuant to [subsection (b)]
subsections (b) and (c) of this section, recommendations for any
legislation necessary to implement such plan and the department's
timeline for implementation of such plan.
Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) The Department of Correction
and the Correction Medical and Health Commission, established
pursuant to section 9 of this act, in consultation with the Department of
Public Health, shall establish and maintain a list of time-critical
medications, including, but not limited to, medications for diabetes,
seizure disorders, cardiac conditions, serious mental illness and other
medication-assisted treatment. Such list shall include strict timing
windows and escalation protocols for the administration of each such
medication and detailed protocol for how such medications shall be
administered by the Department of Correction during a lock down of a
facility. Any such medication that is administered outside of the
prescribed timing window or not in accordance with escalation or lock-
down protocols shall cause the documentation of such missed or
Public Act No. 26-40 23 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
delayed administration, including any justification for such missed or
delayed administration. In the case of a person who is incarcerated
refusing medication, such refusal shall be in written form and signed by
such person. All such documentation shall be subject to review by a
supervisor.
(b) (1) On and after January 1, 2027, the Department of Correction and
the Correctional Medical and Health Commission shall produce and
publish quarterly a medical scorecard detailing the following for each
correctional facility:
(A) Medical staffing levels;
(B) Vacancy rates for medical staff positions and the average time
required to fill each such position;
(C) The use of temporary or agency staff to perform duties that would
not otherwise be performed due to such vacancies; and
(D) Any suspensions or terminations of medical staff, including those
due to failure to maintain proper licensure as required pursuant to
subsection (h) of section 18-81ll of the general statutes, as amended by
this act.
(2) (A) The Department of Correction and the Correctional Medical
and Health Commission shall develop, in writing, for each correctional
facility a contingency staffing plan for whenever the vacancy rate for
health services positions reaches twenty per cent of all such positions at
the facility. The department and commission shall consult with health
services professionals and representatives from each of the bargaining
units representing employees who would fill such positions or who are
affected by the vacancies in such positions in the development of any
such plan. Each such plan shall prioritize voluntary coverage by
permanent health services staff and may include the use of additional
compensation or other incentives to maintain continuity of care. Not
Public Act No. 26-40 24 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
later than thirty days following the development of each such plan, the
department and commission, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, shall report each such plan to the
joint standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance
of matters relating to the Department of Correction and the budgets of
state agencies.
(B) The department shall implement the plan developed pursuant to
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision for any correctional facility where
the vacancy rate for the health services positions reaches twenty per cent
of all such positions at the facility, provided the department shall not
implement such plan in a manner that results in health services staffing
levels below those necessary to ensure the safe and adequate delivery of
health care services and that such plan shall not be used as a substitute
for the timely recruitment and hiring of permanent health services staff.
(C) The department shall take all reasonable steps to fill vacancies as
expeditiously as practicable and shall not rely on contingency staffing
plans in lieu of sustained recruitment and retention efforts.
(3) The Department of Correction and the Correctional Medical and
Health Commission shall report each medical scorecard produced
pursuant to this section to the Office of the Correction Ombuds
established pursuant to section 18-81qq of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, and to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the Department of
Correction in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
general statutes.
Sec. 5. Section 54-91a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) No defendant convicted of a crime, other than a capital felony
under the provisions of section 53a-54b in effect prior to April 25, 2012,
Public Act No. 26-40 25 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
or murder with special circumstances under the provisions of section
53a-54b in effect on or after April 25, 2012, the punishment for which
may include imprisonment for more than one year, may be sentenced,
or the defendant's case otherwise disposed of, until a written report of
investigation by a probation officer has been presented to and
considered by the court, if the defendant is so convicted for the first time
in this state or upon any conviction of a felony involving family violence
pursuant to section 46b-38a for which the punishment may include
imprisonment; but any court may, in its discretion, order a presentence
investigation for a defendant convicted of any crime or offense other
than a capital felony under the provisions of section 53a-54b in effect
prior to April 25, 2012, or murder with special circumstances under the
provisions of section 53a-54b in effect on or after April 25, 2012.
(b) A defendant who is convicted of a crime and is not eligible for
sentence review pursuant to section 51-195 may, with the consent of the
sentencing judge and the prosecuting official, waive the presentence
investigation, except that the presentence investigation may not be
waived when the defendant is convicted of a felony involving family
violence pursuant to section 46b-38a and the punishment for which may
include imprisonment.
(c) Whenever an investigation is required, the probation officer shall
promptly inquire into the circumstances of the offense, the attitude of
the complainant or victim, or of the immediate family where possible in
cases of homicide, and the criminal record, social history and present
condition of the defendant. Such investigation shall include an inquiry
into any damages suffered by the victim, including medical expenses,
loss of earnings and property loss. All local and state police agencies
shall furnish to the probation officer such criminal records as the
probation officer may request. When in the opinion of the court or the
investigating authority it is desirable, such investigation shall include a
physical and mental examination of the defendant. If the defendant is
Public Act No. 26-40 26 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
committed to any institution, the investigating agency shall send the
reports of such investigation to the institution at the time of
commitment.
(d) In lieu of ordering a full presentence investigation, the court may
order an abridged version of such investigation, which (1) shall contain
(A) identifying information about the defendant, (B) information about
the pending case from the record of the court, (C) the circumstances of
the offense, (D) the attitude of the complainant or victim, (E) any
damages suffered by the victim, including medical expenses, loss of
earnings and property loss, and (F) the criminal record of the defendant,
and (2) may encompass one or more areas of the social history and
present condition of the defendant, including family background,
significant relationships or children, educational attainment or
vocational training, employment history, financial situation, housing
situation, medical status, mental health status, substance abuse history,
the results of any clinical evaluation conducted of the defendant or any
other information required by the court that is consistent with the
provisions of this section. If the court orders an abridged version of such
investigation for a felony involving family violence, as defined in
section 46b-38a, the abridged version of such investigation shall, in
addition to the information set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection,
contain the following information concerning the defendant: (A) Family
background, (B) significant relationships or children, (C) mental health
status, and (D) substance abuse history.
(e) In any presentence investigation report, if the defendant has
entered into a plea agreement for which there is a sentencing
recommendation for a period of incarceration, or there is any other
information that indicates that such defendant may be sentenced to a
period of incarceration, the probation officer shall inquire into such
defendant's medical and prescription history for the last five years prior
to such defendant accepting such agreement. Such history shall be
Public Act No. 26-40 27 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
included in an appendix to such report. Such probation officer shall
notify the Department of Correction and the Office of the Correction
Ombuds by electronic mail not later than five days prior to such
defendant's sentencing. If such defendant refuses to supply such
defendant's medical and prescription history, such probation officer
shall (1) document the attempts to solicit such information from such
defendant, and (2) sign a sworn statement attesting to such refusal. Such
appendix and any documentation and sworn statement described in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection shall be recorded in the
electronic health records system maintained by the department in
accordance with subsection (f) of section 18-81ll, as amended by this act,
and available for such defendant to review in the same manner as other
health records are reviewable.
[(e)] (f) Any information contained in the files or report of an
investigation pursuant to this section shall be available to the Court
Support Services Division for the purpose of performing the duties
contained in section 54-63d and to the Department of Mental Health and
Addiction Services for purposes of diagnosis and treatment.
Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a
Department of Correction nurse and social workers student loan
reimbursement program to be administered by the Office of Higher
Education.
(b) Within available bond authorizations, the program shall provide
a student loan reimbursement grant for persons who are licensed as a
nurse pursuant to the provisions of chapter 378 of the general statutes
or a clinical social worker pursuant to chapter 383b of the general
statutes and employed by the Department of Correction in a position
requiring such licensure, as applicable.
(c) Persons who qualify under subsection (b) of this section shall be
reimbursed annually in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars
Public Act No. 26-40 28 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
for documented loan payments. Any such person shall only be
reimbursed if such person is employed as described in subsection (b) of
this section at the time of application for loan reimbursement pursuant
to this section. As part of any such application, a person may request
reimbursement in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars
annually for employment described in subsection (b) of this section for
any previous year of such employment, provided such person has not
already received reimbursement for such loan payments through this
program or any other program. Persons may apply for reimbursement
to the Office of Higher Education at such time and in such manner as
the Commissioner of Higher Education prescribes. No person receiving
reimbursement pursuant to this section may be reimbursed more than
twenty thousand dollars cumulatively for all years of qualified loan
payments.
(d) Any unexpended funds appropriated for purposes of this section
shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year but shall be available for
expenditure during the next fiscal year.
(e) During each fiscal year in which funds are appropriated for the
program established pursuant to this section, the Office of Higher
Education may use up to five per cent of such funds for program
administration, promotion and recruitment activities.
Sec. 7. Section 18-81ss of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) The Commissioner of Correction shall provide palatable and
nutritious meals to each person in the custody of the commissioner.
Under no circumstances shall the commissioner permit such persons to
be fed nutraloaf as a form of discipline or any other punitive diet. [(b)]
For purposes of this [section] subsection, "nutraloaf" means a mixture of
foods blended together and baked into a solid loaf and "punitive diet"
Public Act No. 26-40 29 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
means a diet that is used for punishment purposes.
(b) (1) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Auditors of Public Accounts
shall complete an audit of the Department of Correction's nutrition and
food service and commissary programs. Such audit shall evaluate (A)
compliance with subsection (a) of this section through an examination
of nutritional adequacy of meals and quality of food served in
department facilities, (B) compliance with therapeutic diet needs of
persons who are incarcerated, (C) cost efficiency of the nutrition food
service program, (D) any irregularities in the commissary program, and
(E) any patterns of grievances of persons who are incarcerated
concerning compliance with subsection (a) of this section or other issues
concerning the department's nutrition and food service program or
commissary program.
(2) The Auditors of Public Accounts may, within available
appropriations, contract with an independent auditor with expertise in
conducting the type of audit described in this subsection to carry out the
provisions of this subsection.
(c) Not later than July 15, 2027, the Auditors of Public Accounts shall
submit a report of the audit conducted pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section to the Commissioner of Correction and the Correction Ombuds
and to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to the Department of Correction in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a.
(d) Not later than January 11, 2028, the Commissioner of Correction,
in consultation with the Correction Medical and Health Commission
established pursuant to section 9 of this act, shall develop and submit to
the Office of the Correction Ombuds and the joint standing committee
of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the
Department of Correction, in accordance with the provisions of section
11-4a, a report including (1) a corrective action plan that is responsive to
Public Act No. 26-40 30 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
any concerns or issues noted in the report of the audit conducted
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, and (2) a determination of
whether the department should employ a nutritionist and a dietician to
work collaboratively in compliance with the provisions of subsection (a)
of this section and to address any concerns or issues noted in such
report.
Sec. 8. Section 18-100j of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Not later than October 1, 2013, the Department of Correction may
initiate, with support from the Departments of Mental Health and
Addiction Services and Public Health, a pilot treatment program for
methadone maintenance and other drug therapies at facilities including,
but not limited to, the New Haven Community Correctional Center. The
pilot program shall serve sixty to eighty inmates per month. The
Department of Public Health may waive public health code regulations
that are not applicable to the service model of the pilot program. Not
later than July 1, 2019, the Department of Correction shall report on the
results of the program to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human services, the
judiciary, public health and appropriations and the budgets of state
agencies.
(b) Not later than October 1, 2026, the Department of Correction shall
initiate at a minimum security correctional facility a pilot program
permitting persons who are incarcerated to retain and self-administer
certain medications for chronic disease management. Such program
shall be administered by a medical staff member from within the
Department of Correction who is licensed by the Department of Public
Health who shall determine which persons taking which medications
may be eligible for participation. Any such participation by persons who
are eligible shall not be compelled. Eligibility for participation in the
program may be revoked for documented misuse of medication or if
Public Act No. 26-40 31 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
such person or medication poses a safety risk to such person or another
person. Not later than January 1, 2028, the Department of Correction
shall report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, on the
results of such program to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the Department of
Correction.
(c) (1) Not later than October 1, 2027, the Departments of Correction,
Mental Health and Addiction Services and Social Services and the Office
of Policy and Management shall, within available appropriations,
initiate a pilot program to assist with discharge planning for patients
with chronic disease and behavioral health needs, including mental
health and substance abuse disorders, and to coordinate specialty care
referrals for persons who are incarcerated at York Correctional
Institution upon release. Such program shall be administered by the
health services and behavioral health employees within the Department
of Correction and shall expand internal capacity for discharge planning
and care coordination, including coordination with the Department of
Mental Health and Addiction Services, to facilitate access to programs
and services upon release. Said departments and office shall contract
with a federally qualified health center in this state to work with
Department of Correction health services and behavioral health
employees to provide community-based care for persons upon release
for not fewer than two years. The federally qualified health center shall
work with Department of Correction employees to improve continuity
of care and community health care standards for said department. The
provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to permit the
contracting out of work customarily performed by Department of
Correction employees.
(2) Not later than January 15, 2029, and January fifteenth following
each calendar year thereafter during which such program is maintained,
the Departments of Mental Health and Addiction Services and Social
Public Act No. 26-40 32 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
Services, the Office of Policy and Management, the Department of
Correction health services and behavioral health employees and the
federally qualified health center assisting with such program shall
report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, on the results
of such program to the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the Department of
Correction, human services and public health. Such reports shall
evaluate the (A) effectiveness of discharge planning and reentry care
coordination for participants in the program, (B) management and
continuity of care for chronic diseases among participants in the
program, (C) coordination, timeliness and completion of specialty care
referrals for participants in the program, (D) extent to which
participants successfully access community-based health care services
following release from the correctional institution, and (E) costs of the
program when compared to other delivery of care models in use at the
time such program is initiated.
Sec. 9. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a
Correction Medical and Health Commission. Said commission shall
make recommendations for improving medical, nutrition, behavioral
health and health care services provided to persons who are
incarcerated and outcomes for such persons. Said commission shall
develop a ten-year plan to improve health care and food services in
correctional facilities. Said commission may update such plan as the
commission deems necessary.
(b) Said commission shall consist of the following members:
(1) The House and Senate chairpersons of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to the Department of Correction, or their designees;
(2) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives
who shall be a physician with experience with correctional medicine,
Public Act No. 26-40 33 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
emergency medicine or internal medicine;
(3) One appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate who
shall be a public health expert or epidemiologist with experience in
population health or correctional health systems;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives who shall be an expert in correctional policy, reentry
services or criminal justice reform with experience working with
formerly incarcerated populations;
(5) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate who shall be a
behavioral health professional, who may be a psychiatrist, psychologist
or licensed clinical social worker with experience in forensic or
correctional mental health;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives who shall be a chief executive officer of a nonprofit
hospital in this state or the chief executive officer or an executive
member of an association of hospitals;
(7) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate who shall be
an expert in health care finance;
(8) One appointed by the House ranking member of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to the Department of Correction who shall be a clinical
pharmacist;
(9) One appointed by the Senate ranking member of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to the Department of Correction who shall be a registered nurse,
advanced practice registered nurse or a physician assistant with
experience in institutional or community health care;
Public Act No. 26-40 34 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
(10) Three appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be a person
who holds a doctorate in nutrition, one of whom shall be a formerly
incarcerated person with experience navigating health care services
while incarcerated in a Department of Correction facility and one of
whom shall be a representative of a federally qualified health center in
this state;
(11) Four appointed jointly by the House and Senate chairpersons of
the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to the Department of Correction, who
shall be representatives of each of the four bargaining units representing
the employees of the Department of Correction whose job duties include
direct interaction with persons who are incarcerated;
(12) The chief executive officer of The University of Connecticut
Health Center, or the chief executive officer's designee;
(13) The undersecretary of the Criminal Justice Policy and Planning
Division within the Office of Policy and Management, or the
undersecretary's designee;
(14) The Medicaid Director within the Department of Social Services,
or the director's designee; and
(15) The Correction Ombuds, or the Correction Ombuds' designee.
(c) No member appointed under subdivisions (2) to (11), inclusive, of
subsection (b) of this section may be a member of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the commission shall be appointed not
later than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Each
member of the commission appointed pursuant to subdivisions (2) to
(10), inclusive, of subsection (b) of this section shall serve for a term that
is coterminous with the term of the member's appointing authority. Any
member who misses three consecutive meetings of the commission shall
Public Act No. 26-40 35 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
be deemed to have resigned. A vacancy shall be filled by the original
appointing authority for the balance of the unexpired term.
(e) The members described in subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this
section shall be the chairpersons of the commission. Such chairpersons
shall schedule the first meeting of the commission, which shall be held
not later than sixty days after the effective date of this section.
(f) Two-thirds of the membership of the commission shall constitute
a quorum and all actions shall require the affirmative vote of a quorum.
(g) The members of the commission shall serve without
compensation, but shall, within the limits of available funds, be
reimbursed for expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of
their duties.
(h) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the
Department of Correction shall serve as administrative staff of the
commission.
(i) The commission shall (1) not later than January 1, 2027, report the
plan developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, including any
recommendations for legislation in support of such plan, and (2) not
later than thirty days after the completion of any update to such plan,
report such updated plan, including any recommendations for
legislation in support of such updated plan, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to the Department of Correction.
(j) The commission shall carry out the duties prescribed to it by the
provisions of subsection (d) of section 18-81ss of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, and section 4 of this act, and any other duties
prescribed to it by law.
Public Act No. 26-40 36 of 37

Substitute House Bill No. 5567
Governor's Action:
Approved May 26, 2026
Public Act No. 26-40 37 of 37